local/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
    <pardef n="src/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="ins"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="ins"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mest/o__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="ins"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="ins"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ko/st__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sti</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sti</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šću</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ins"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sti</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sti</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>sti</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stiju</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stima</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sti</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sti</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stima</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ins"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stima</l>
          <r>st<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="stolic/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ins"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="dat"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="acc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="voc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ins"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="srce"><i>src</i><par n="src/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kost"><i>ko</i><par n="ko/st__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cigareta"><i>cigaret</i><par n="stolic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lebdjelica"><i>lebdjelic</i><par n="stolic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plaža"><i>plaž</i><par n="stolic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="luka"><i>luk</i><par n="stolic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zračna luka"><i>zračna<b/>luk</i><par n="stolic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kafa"><i>kaf</i><par n="stolic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kava" r="LR"><i>kav</i><par n="stolic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kahva" r="LR"><i>kahv</i><par n="stolic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mesto"><i>m</i><par n="e_je__yat"/><i>st</i><par n="mest/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pivo"><i>piv</i><par n="mest/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stolica"><i>stolic</i><par n="stolic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rakija"><i>rakij</i><par n="stolic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žena"><i>žen</i><par n="stolic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="knjižara"><i>knjižar</i><par n="stolic/a__n"/></e>
